en: Home-made bread with flour for home-made bread preparation
fr: Pain blanc maison avec farine pour machine à pain

en: Croutons, crouton
af: Crouton
be: грэнкі
bg: Крутони
ca: crostó
de: Croûtons, Crouton
el: κρουτόν
es: croûton
eu: ogi-txigorki
fr: croûtons, croûton, croutons
he: קרוטונים
hr: Krutoni
it: crostini
ja: クルトン
kk: ерутон
kn: ಕ್ರೂಟಾನ್
ko: 크루통
lt: Skrebučiai
nl: croutons, broodkorstjes, crouton
pl: kruton
pt: croûton
ro: Crutoane
ru: гренки
sv: krutong
tr: kruton
uk: грінки
zh: 麵包丁

en: Croutons for spreads
fr: Croûtons à tartiner

en: Plain croutons
fr: Croûtons nature

en: Croutons with onions
fr: Croûtons aux oignons

en: Croutons with herbs
fr: Croûtons aux fines herbes

en: Croutons with garlic
fr: Croûtons à l'ail

en: Rusks, rusk, Zwieback
de: Zwiebäcke, Zwiebacke, Zwieback
es: Biscotes
fr: Biscottes, Biscotte
hr: Dvopek
it: Fette biscottate, Pane abbrustolito
ja: ラスク
lt: Džiūvėsiai
nl: Beschuiten, Beschuit
pl: Sucharki, Suchary
ru: Сухари

en: Spelt rusks
de: Dinkelzwieback
fr: Biscottes d'épeautre, Biscottes à la farine d'épeautre, Biscottes d’épeautre
hr: Dvopek od pira
it: Fette biscottate di farro
lt: Spelta džiūvėsiai
nl: Speltbeschuiten, Speltbeschuit

en: Common wheat rusks
de: Weizenzwieback
fr: Biscottes de froment, Biscottes au froment
nl: Tarwebeschuiten, Tarwebeschuit

en: Multigrain rusks, Multigrain rusk
de: Mehrkorn Zwieback, Getreide Zwieback
fr: Biscottes multicéréales, Biscottes aux céréales
hr: Višezrnati dvopek
it: Fette biscottate multicereali
lt: Įvairių grūdų džiuvėsiai
nl: Meergranen beschuiten, Meergranen beschuit, Granenbeschuiten, Granenbeschuit

en: Wholemeal rusks, Wholemeal rusk, High-fiber rusk
de: Vollkorn Zwieback
fr: Biscottes complètes, Biscottes riches en fibres
hr: Integralni dvopek
it: Fette biscottate integrali, Fetta biscottata integrale
lt: Viso grūdo džiūvėsiai
nl: Volkorenbeschuiten, Volkorenbeschuit

en: Rusks without salt, Unsalted rusk
de: Salzarmer Zwieback
fr: Biscottes sans sel, Biscottes pauvres en sel, Biscotte sans adjonction de sel
nl: Zoutarme beschuiten, Zoutarme beschuit

en: Rusk with eggs
fr: Biscottes briochées

en: Pains de campagne, Pain de campagne
de: Landbrot
fi: maalaisleipä
fr: Pains de campagne, Pain de campagne
hr: Pains de campagne
nl: Boerenbroden, Boerenbrood

en: Pre-baked breads, part-baked breads, prebaked breads, precooked breads
de: Vorgebackene Brote
es: Panes precocidos
fi: esipaistetut leivät
fr: Pains précuits, pain précuit
hr: Prethodno pečeni kruhovi
it: Pane pre-cotto
lt: Iškeptos duonos
nl: Afbakbroden, Voorgebakken broden, Voorgebakken brood

en: Frozen pre-baked breads, frozen part-baked breads
fr: Pains précuits surgelés, pain précuit surgelé

en: Frozen pre-baked hamburger buns
fr: Pains Burger précuits surgelés, Pains pour hamburgersprécuits surgelés

en: Special breads
bg: Специални хлябове
ca: Pans especials
de: Spezielle Brote
es: Panes especiales
fi: erikoisleivät
fr: Pains spéciaux, Pain spéciaux
he: לחמים מיוחדים
hr: Posebni kruhovi
hu: Speciális kenyerek
it: Pani speciali
lt: Specialios duonos
nl: Speciale broden, Speciaal brood
pt: Pães especiais
zh: 特殊面包

en: Bread Pretzels
de: Brot Brezeln
fr: Pains Bretzels, Pain bretzel, Pains bretzel
hr: Pereci za kruh
nl: Brood Pretzels